Missouri, session 2026, SB927.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Missouri, as follows:
Section A. Chapter 196, RSMo, is amended by adding thereto
two new sections, to be known as sections 196.1170 and 196.1175,
to read as follows:
196.1170. 1. As used in this section, the following
terms mean:
(1) "Adulterated", the addition of fentanyl or any
other controlled substance, a synthesized alkaloid or semi-
synthesized alkaloid, or another substance prohibited by law;
(2) "Alkaloid fraction", a portion of a plant or plant
extract that contains primarily alkaloid compounds;
(3) "Controlled substance", the same meaning as in
section 195.010;
(4) "Kratom leaf", the leaf of the Mitragyna speciosa
plant in fresh, dehydrated, or dried form;
(5) "Kratom leaf extract", the material extracted from
a kratom leaf through the application of a solvent
consisting of water, ethanol, food-grade carbon dioxide, or
another solvent allowed by federal or state law to be used
in the manufacturing of a food ingredient;
(6) "Kratom product", a food or dietary supplement
that consists of, or contains, any part of a kratom leaf, a
kratom leaf extract, or any kratom alkaloid, kratom
constituent, or kratom metabolite. "Kratom product" shall
not include any synthesized alkaloids or semi-synthesized
alkaloids;
1

(7) "Semi-synthesized alkaloid", an alkaloid or
alkaloid derivative of the kratom leaf that has been created
by chemical synthesis or biosynthetic means, including, but
not limited to, fermentation, recombinant techniques, yeast-
derived techniques, and enzymatic techniques, rather than by
traditional food preparation techniques such as heat or
extracting.
2. No person shall:
(1) Knowingly prepare, distribute, advertise, sell, or
offer to sell a kratom product:
(a) That is adulterated;
(b) To a person under twenty-one years of age;
(c) That contains 7-hydroxymitragynine concentrated at
a level above eight hundred parts per million on a dry-
weight basis;
(d) That is a confection; mimics a candy product; or
is manufactured, packaged, or distributed in a way that is
appealing to children, including, but not limited to, the
distinct shape of a human, an animal, or fruit; or
(e) That is combustible or intended for vaporization;
(2) Prepare, distribute, advertise, sell, or offer to
sell a kratom product that does not have a label that
clearly and conspicuously sets forth on each retail package:
(a) The name and address for the place of business of
the manufacturer or distributor of the kratom product;
(b) The full list of ingredients in the kratom product;
(c) A disclosure and advice:
a. Against use by individuals who are under twenty-
one years of age, pregnant, or breast-feeding;
b. To consult a health care professional prior to use;
c. That kratom may be habit-forming; and
d. That kratom may interact with certain medications,
drugs, and controlled substances;
2

(d) The following statements:
a. "THESE STATEMENTS HAVE NOT BEEN EVALUATED BY THE
FOOD AND DRUG ADMINISTRATION. THIS PRODUCT IS NOT INTENDED
TO DIAGNOSE, TREAT, CURE, OR PREVENT ANY DISEASE."; and
b. "KEEP OUT OF REACH OF CHILDREN."; and
(e) Directions for use that include:
a. A recommended amount of the kratom product per
serving;
b. The number of recommended servings per package;
c. A recommended number of servings of the kratom
product that can be safely consumed in a twenty-four-hour
period; and
d. Quantitative declarations of the amount of
mitragynine and the amount of 7-hydroxymitragynine per
serving of the kratom product; and
(3) Manufacture, package, label, or distribute a
kratom product that:
(a) Contains synthesized alkaloids or semi-synthesized
alkaloids; or
(b) Has 7-hydroxymitragynine concentrated at a level
above eight hundred parts per million on a dry-weight basis.
3. A person that conducts the activities described in
subsection 2 of this section shall be deemed to have engaged
in an unlawful practice in violation of section 407.020.
196.1175. 1. (1) A person shall not give, sell,
distribute, dispense, or offer for sale a kratom product to
any person who is under twenty-one years of age. Before
giving, selling, distributing, dispensing, or offering to
sell an individual any kratom product, a person shall
request from the individual and examine a government-issued
photographic identification that establishes that the
individual is twenty-one years of age or older. A violation
of this subsection shall constitute an infraction.
3

(2) It shall be an affirmative defense for any person
alleged to have violated the provisions of subsection 1 of
this section that the person furnishing the kratom product
was presented with and reasonably relied upon a government-
issued photographic identification that identified the
individual receiving the kratom product as being twenty-one
years of age or older.
2. Nothing in the provisions of this section shall be
interpreted to prohibit a political subdivision from
enacting an ordinance, rule, or regulation prohibiting the
sale of kratom products to persons under twenty-one years of
age or imposing requirements more stringent than those
provided in this section; provided, that such ordinance,
rule, or regulation does not establish a minimum age to
purchase kratom products that is under twenty-one years of
age.
3. As used in this section, the term "kratom" shall
mean:
(1) Any part of the leaf of the Mitragyna speciosa
plant if the plant contains the alkaloid mitragynine or 7-
hydroxymitragynine; or
(2) A synthetic material that contains the alkaloid
mitragynine or 7-hydroxymitragynine.
4